en: Nativity Sets
xx: Nativity Sets
cs: Betlémy
da: Krybbespil
de: Krippen
es: Portales
fr: Crèches de Noël
it: Presepi
ja: キリスト降誕の飾り
nl: Kerststallen
no: Juleoppsatser
pl: Szopki bożonarodzeniowe
pt: Presépios
ru: Наборы для рождественских вертепов
sv: Julkrubbor
tr: Doğum Setleri

en: Seasonal Village Sets & Accessories
xx: Seasonal Village Sets & Accessories
cs: Sady sezónních dekorací ve venkovském stylu a příslušenství
da: Sæt med modellandsbyer og tilbehør dertil
de: Modellbaudörfer & -zubehör mit saisonalem Bezug
es: Accesorios y conjuntos de aldeas en miniatura
fr: Accessoires et coffrets de villages saisonniers
it: Accessori e decorazioni per riproduzioni in miniatura
ja: 季節のビレッジセット・アクセサリー
nl: Accessoires voor feestdagminiaturen
no: Sett med høytidsbaserte landsbyer og tilbehør
pl: Szopki świąteczne i domki z dodatkami
pt: Acessórios e conjuntos de miniaturas sazonais
ru: Праздничные наборы и украшения для сада
sv: Säsongsbaserade miniatyrbyar och tillbehör
tr: Mevsimlik Köy Setleri ve Aksesuarları

en: Shadow Boxes
xx: Shadow Boxes
cs: Pamětní vitríny
da: Skyggerammer
de: Schaukästen
es: Marcos tipo caja
fr: Présentoirs
it: Bacheche portaoggetti
ja: シャドーボックス
nl: Vitrinedoosjes
no: Skyggebokser
pl: Gabloty
pt: Molduras tipo vitrine
ru: Застекленные коробки
sv: Tittskåp
tr: Camlı Kutular

en: Slipcovers
xx: Slipcovers
cs: Povlaky
da: Møbelovertræk
de: Schonbezüge
es: Fundas
fr: Housses, Housse (décoration), Housses décoratives, Housse pour meuble
it: Copridivani
ja: ソファーカバー
nl: Meubelhoezen
no: Møbeltrekk
pl: Narzuty
pt: Capas de sofás
ru: Мебельные чехлы
sv: Möbelöverdrag
tr: Koltuk Kılıfları

en: Snow Globes
xx: Snow Globes
cs: Sněhové koule
da: Snekugler
de: Schneekugeln
es: Bolas de nieve
fr: Boules à neige
it: Palle di neve
ja: スノードーム
nl: Sneeuwbollen
no: Snøkuler
pl: Kule śnieżne
pt: Globos de neve
ru: Снежные шары
sv: Snökulor
tr: Kar Küreleri

en: Suncatchers
xx: Suncatchers
cs: Skleněné dekorace do oken
da: Glasmosaikker
de: Glasfensterbilder
es: Atrapasoles
fr: Attrape-soleil
it: Acchiappasole
ja: サンキャッチャー
nl: Zonvangers
no: Prismer og lysfangere
pl: Witrażyki
pt: Vidros decorativos que refletem a luz solar
ru: Ловцы солнца
sv: Ljusfångare
tr: Günışığı Yakalayıcılar

en: Sundials
xx: Sundials
cs: Sluneční hodiny
da: Solure
de: Sonnenuhren
es: Relojes de sol
fr: Cadrans solaires
it: Meridiane
ja: 日時計
nl: Zonnewijzers
no: Solur
pl: Zegary słoneczne
pt: Relógios de sol
ru: Солнечные часы
sv: Solur
tr: Güneş Saatleri

en: Throw Pillows
xx: Throw Pillows
cs: Polštářky
da: Pyntepuder
de: Zierkissen
es: Cojines
fr: Coussins décoratifs, Coussin
it: Cuscini foderati
ja: クッション
nl: Kussentjes
no: Pynteputer
pl: Poduszki dekoracyjne
pt: Almofadas
ru: Диванные подушки
sv: Prydnadskuddar
tr: Kırlentler

en: Trunks
xx: Trunks
cs: Cestovní kufry
da: Kufferter
de: Truhen
es: Baúles
fr: Malles
it: Bauli
ja: トランク
nl: Hutkoffers
no: Kasser
pl: Kufry
pt: Baús
ru: Кофры
sv: Koffertar
tr: Sandıklar

en: Vase Fillers & Table Scatters
xx: Vase Fillers & Table Scatters
cs: Výplně váz a dekorace na stůl
da: Vasefyld og bordpynt
de: Vasenfüller & Streudeko
es: Rellenos para jarrones y decoraciones para mesas
fr: Cailloux de table et matériaux de remplissage pour vases
it: Materiali di riempimento per vasi e decorazioni per tavoli
ja: 装飾用ストーン・ビー玉
nl: Opvulmateriaal voor vazen en losse tafeldecoratie
no: Vasefyll og bordpynt
pl: Przedmioty ozdobne do wazonów i kamienie dekoracyjne
pt: Pedras decorativas
ru: Наполнители для ваз и конфетти
sv: Vasutfyllnad och bordsdekorationer
tr: Vazo Dolguları ve Masaüstü Süsleme Taşları

en: Vases
xx: Vases
cs: Vázy
da: Vaser
de: Vasen
es: Floreros
fr: Vases
it: Vasi
ja: 花瓶
nl: Vazen
no: Vaser
pl: Wazony
pt: Vasos
ru: Вазы
sv: Vaser
tr: Vazolar

en: Wallpaper
xx: Wallpaper
cs: Tapety
da: Tapet
de: Tapeten
es: Papel pintado
fr: Papiers peints
it: Carta da parati
ja: 壁紙・クロス
nl: Behang
no: Tapet
pl: Tapety
pt: Papel de parede
ru: Обои
sv: Tapet
tr: Duvar Kağıdı

en: Weather Vanes & Roof Decor
xx: Weather Vanes & Roof Decor
cs: Korouhvičky a střešní dekorace
da: Vejrhaner og tagpynt
de: Wetterfahnen & Dachdekoration
es: Veletas y decoración de tejados
fr: Girouettes et décorations de toit
it: Segnavento e ornamenti tetti
ja: 風向計・屋根飾り
nl: Windvanen en dakversiering
no: Værhaner og takdekor
pl: Wiatrowskazy i ozdoby dachowe
pt: Cata-ventos e decoração de telhado
ru: Флюгеры и украшения для крыш
sv: Vindflöjlar och takdekor
tr: Yelkovanlar ve Çatı Süsleri

en: Wind Chimes
xx: Wind Chimes
cs: Závěsné zvonkohry
da: Vindklokker
de: Windspiele
es: Carillones de viento
fr: Carillons
it: Campane del vento
ja: 風鈴・ウィンドチャイム
nl: Windklokken
no: Vindspill
pl: Dzwonki wietrzne
pt: Sinos de vento
ru: Ветряные колокольчики
sv: Vindspel
tr: Rüzgar Zilleri

en: Wind Wheels & Spinners
xx: Wind Wheels & Spinners
cs: Zahradní větrníky
da: Vindhjul
de: Windräder
es: Molinillos de viento
fr: Roues à vent et girouettes
it: Girandole e banderuole
ja: かざぐるま
nl: Windmolentjes en -spinners
no: Vindhjul og -spiraler
pl: Wiatraczki
pt: Rodas de vento
ru: Декоративные ветряные колеса
sv: Vindhjul
tr: Rüzgar Gülleri ve Fırıldakları

en: Window Magnets
xx: Window Magnets
cs: Magnety na okna
da: Vinduesmagneter
de: Fensterschmuckmagnete
es: Imanes para ventanas
fr: Décorations magnétiques pour fenêtres
it: Calamite per finestre
ja: 窓用マグネット
nl: Raammagneten
no: Vindusmagneter
pl: Magnesy okienne
pt: Imãs de janela
ru: Магниты на окна
sv: Fönstermagneter
tr: Pencere Magnetleri

en: Window Treatment Accessories
xx: Window Treatment Accessories
cs: Závěsy a záclony
da: Vinduesudsmykning – tilbehør
de: Zubehör zur Fensterdekoration
es: Accesorios de elementos decorativos para ventanas
fr: Accessoires pour le traitement des fenêtres
it: Accessori per il trattamento delle finestre
ja: 窓飾り
nl: Accessoires voor de behandeling van ramen
no: Vindustilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do okien
pt: Acessórios para manutenção de janelas
ru: Принадлежности для украшения окон
sv: Tillbehör till fönsterbehandling
tr: Pencere Dekoru Aksesuarları

en: Curtain & Drape Rings
xx: Curtain & Drape Rings
cs: Kroužky na záclony a závěsy
da: Gardinringe
de: Gardinen- & Vorhangringe
es: Anillas para cortinas y visillos
fr: Anneaux de rideaux
it: Anelli per tende e tendaggi
ja: カーテンリング
nl: Gordijn- en draperieringen
no: Ringer til gardiner og forheng
pl: Pierścienie do zasłon
pt: Anéis para cortina
ru: Кольца для занавесок и портьер
sv: Gardin- och draperiringar
tr: Tül ve Perde Halkaları

en: Curtain & Drape Rods
xx: Curtain & Drape Rods
cs: Záclonové tyče a garnýže
da: Gardinstænger
de: Gardinen- & Vorhangstangen
es: Barras para cortinas y visillos
fr: Tringles à rideaux, Tringle à rideau, Bouton de tringle à rideau
it: Bastoni per tende e tendaggi
ja: カーテンレール
nl: Gordijn- en draperiestangen
no: Stenger til gardiner og forheng
pl: Karnisze do zasłon
pt: Varas de cortina
ru: Карнизы для занавесок и портьер
sv: Gardin- och draperistänger
tr: Tül ve Perde Çubukları

en: Curtain Heading Tape
xx: Curtain Heading Tape
fr: Bandes d'accrochage pour rideaux, Bande d'accrochage de rideau, Bande d'ancrage de rideau